Utah statutes.
72-1-304.   Written project prioritization process for new transportation capacity projects -- Rulemaking.

(1)  The Transportation Commission, in consultation with the department and the metropolitan planning organizations as defined in Section 72-1-208.5, shall develop a written prioritization process for the prioritization of new transportation capacity projects that are or will be part of the state highway system under Chapter 4, Part 1, State Highways.

(2)  The following shall be included in the written prioritization process under Subsection (1):

(a)  a description of how the strategic initiatives of the department adopted under Section 72-1-211 are advanced by the written prioritization process;

(b)  a definition of the type of projects to which the written prioritization process applies;

(c)  specification of a weighted criteria system that is used to rank proposed projects and how it will be used to determine which projects will be prioritized;

(d)  specification of the data that is necessary to apply the weighted ranking criteria; and

(e)  any other provisions the commission considers appropriate.

(3)  In developing the written prioritization process, the commission:

(a)  shall seek and consider public comment by holding public meetings at locations throughout the state; and

(b)  may not consider local matching dollars as provided under Section 72-2-123 unless the state provides an equal opportunity to raise local matching dollars for state highway improvements within each county.

(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Transportation Commission, in consultation with the department, shall make rules establishing the written prioritization process under Subsection (1).

(5)  The commission shall submit the proposed rules under this section to a committee or task force designated by the Legislative Management Committee for review prior to taking final action on the proposed rules or any proposed amendment to the rules described in Subsection (4).

